Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 309 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
ARTICLE 1- PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to reduce the burdens on state governments and to
facilitate the interstate practice and regulation of massage therapy with the goal of
improving public access to, and the safety of, massage therapy services. Through this
compact, the member states seek to establish a regulatory framework which provides
for a new multistate licensing program. Through this additional licensing pathway, the
member states seek to provide increased value and mobility to licensed massage
therapists in the member states, while ensuring the provision of safe, competent, and
reliable services to the public. This compact is designed to achieve the following
objectives, and the member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing
hereto:
A. Increase public access to massage therapy services by providing for a multistate
licensing pathway;
B. Enhance the member states’ ability to protect the public’s health and safety;
C. Enhance the member states’ ability to prevent human trafficking and licensure
fraud;
D. Encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating the multistate practice
of massage therapy;
E. Support relocating military members and their spouses;
F. Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary
information between the member states;
G. Create an interstate commission that will exist to implement and administer the
compact;
Page 1 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
H. Allow a member state to hold a licensee accountable, even where that licensee
holds a multistate license;
I. Create a streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in member states, thus
increasing the mobility of duly licensed massage therapists; and
J. Serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and the public receiving their
services; however
K. Nothing in this compact is intended to prevent a state from enforcing its own laws
regarding the practice of massage therapy.
ARTICLE 2- DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, except as otherwise provided and subject to clarification by the
rules of the commission, the following definitions shall govern the terms herein:
A. "Active Military Member" means any person with full-time duty status in the
Armed Forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard
and Reserve;
B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or criminal action
permitted by a member state’s laws which is imposed by a licensing authority or
other regulatory body against a licensee, including actions against an
individual’s authorization to practice such as revocation, suspension, probation,
surrender in lieu of discipline, monitoring of the licensee, limitation of the
licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting an
individual’s ability to practice massage therapy, including the issuance of a cease
and desist order;
C. "Alternative Program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or prosecutorial
diversion program approved by a member state’s licensing authority;
D. "Authorization to Practice" means a legal authorization by a remote state
pursuant to a multistate license permitting the practice of massage therapy in that
remote state, which shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the
Page 2 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
licensing authority in that remote state;
E. "Background Check" means the submission of an applicant’s criminal history
record information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. sec. 20.3(d), as amended,
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for
retaining state criminal records in the applicant’s home state;
F. "Charter Member States" means member states who have enacted legislation to
adopt this compact where such legislation predates the effective date of this
compact as defined in Article 12 of this compact;
G. "Commission" means the government agency whose membership consists of all
states that have enacted this compact, which is known as the Interstate Massage
Compact Commission, as defined in Article 8 of this compact, and which shall
operate as an instrumentality of the member states;
H. "Continuing Competence" means a requirement, as a condition of license
renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of, educational
or professional activities that maintain, improve, or enhance massage therapy
fitness to practice;
I. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means investigative information
that a licensing authority, after an inquiry or investigation that complies with a
member state’s due process requirements, has reason to believe is not groundless
and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of that state’s laws regarding the
practice of massage therapy;
J. "Data System" means a repository of information about licensees who hold
multistate licenses, which may include but is not limited to license status,
investigative information, and adverse actions;
K. "Disqualifying Event" means any event which shall disqualify an individual
from holding a multistate license under this compact, which the commission may
by rule specify;
Page 3 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
L. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation or
condition on, the full and unrestricted practice of massage therapy by a licensing
authority;
M. "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates elected or appointed to act on
behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission;
N. "Home State" means the member state which is a licensee’s primary state of
residence where the licensee holds an active single-state license;
O. "Investigative Information" means information, records, or documents received
or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an investigation or other
inquiry;
P. "Licensing Authority" means a state’s regulatory body responsible for issuing
massage therapy licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of massage therapy
in that state;
Q. "Licensee" means an individual who currently holds a license from a member
state to fully practice massage therapy, whose license is not a student, provisional,
temporary, inactive, or other similar status;
R. "Massage Therapy", "Massage Therapy Services", and the "Practice of Massage
Therapy" mean the care and services provided by a licensee as set forth in the
member state’s statutes and regulations in the state where the services are being
provided;
S. "Member State" means any state that has adopted this compact;
T. "Multistate License" means a license that consists of authorizations to practice
massage therapy in all remote states pursuant to this compact, which shall be
subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority in a licensee’s
home state;
U. "National Licensing Examination" means a national examination developed by a
national association of massage therapy regulatory boards, as defined by
Page 4 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
commission rule, that is derived from a practice analysis and is consistent with
generally accepted psychometric principles of fairness, validity, and reliability,
and is administered under secure and confidential examination protocols;
V. "Remote State" means any member state, other than the licensee’s home state;
W. "Rule" means any opinion or regulation promulgated by the commission under
this compact, which shall have the force of law;
X. "Single-State License" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member
state’s licensing authority allowing an individual to fully practice massage
therapy, that is not a restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or inactive
practice authorization and authorizes practice only within the issuing state; and
Y. "State" means a state, territory, possession of the United States, or the District of
Columbia.
ARTICLE 3- MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS
A. To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a member state, a
state must:
1. License and regulate the practice of massage therapy;
2. Have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate complaints
from the public, regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the commission
about licensees practicing in that state;
3. Accept passage of a national licensing examination as a criterion for
massage therapy licensure in that state;
4. Require that licensees satisfy educational requirements prior to being
licensed to provide massage therapy services to the public in that state;
5. Implement procedures for requiring the background check of applicants for
a multistate license, and for the reporting of any disqualifying events,
including but not limited to obtaining and submitting, for each licensee
holding a multistate license and each applicant for a multistate license,
Page 5 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for background checks, receiving the results of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation record search on background checks, and
considering the results of such a background check in making licensure
decisions;
6. Have continuing competence requirements as a condition for license
renewal;
7. Participate in the data system, including through the use of unique
identifying numbers as described herein;
8. Notify the commission and other member states, in compliance with the
terms of the compact and rules of the commission, of any disciplinary action
taken by the state against a licensee practicing under a multistate license in
that state, or of the existence of investigative information or current
significant investigative information regarding a licensee practicing in that
state pursuant to a multistate license;
9. Comply with the rules of the commission; and
10. Accept licensees with valid multistate licenses from other member states as
established herein.
B. Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to apply for a
member state’s single-state license as provided under the laws of each member
state. However, the single-state license granted to those individuals shall not be
recognized as granting a multistate license for massage therapy in any other
member state.
C. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a member
state for the issuance of a single-state license.
D. A multistate license issued to a licensee shall be recognized by each remote state
as an authorization to practice massage therapy in each remote state.
Page 6 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
ARTICLE 4- MULTISTATE LICENSE REQUIREMENTS
A. To qualify for a multistate license under this compact, and to maintain eligibility
for such a license, an applicant must:
1. Hold an active single-state license to practice massage therapy in the
applicant’s home state;
2. Have completed at least six hundred twenty-five (625) clock hours of
massage therapy education or the substantial equivalent which the
commission may approve by rule;
3. Have passed a national licensing examination or the substantial equivalent
which the commission may approve by rule;
4. Submit to a background check;
5. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal
law, within five (5) years prior to the date of their application, where such a
time period shall not include any time served for the offense, and provided
that the applicant has completed any and all requirements arising as a
result of any such offense;
6. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of massage
therapy under applicable state or federal criminal law, within two (2) years
prior to the date of their application where such a time period shall not
include any time served for the offense, and provided that the applicant has
completed any and all requirements arising as a result of any such offense;
7. Have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an agreed
disposition, of any offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under state
or federal law, at any time, relating to any of the following:
a. Kidnapping;
Page 7 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
b. Human trafficking;
c. Human smuggling;
d. Sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related offenses; or
e. Any other category of offense which the commission may by rule
designate;
8. Have not previously held a massage therapy license which was revoked by,
or surrendered in lieu of discipline to, an applicable licensing authority;
9. Have no history of any adverse action on any occupational or professional
license within two (2) years prior to the date of their application; and
10. Pay all required fees.
B. A multistate license granted pursuant to this compact may be effective for a
definite period of time concurrent with the renewal of the home state license.
C. A licensee practicing in a member state is subject to all scope of practice laws
governing massage therapy services in that state.
D. The practice of massage therapy under a multistate license granted pursuant to
this compact will subject the licensee to the jurisdiction of the licensing authority,
the courts, and the laws of the member state in which the massage therapy
services are provided.
ARTICLE 5- AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT
COMMISSION AND MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES
A. Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to
limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to enact and
enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to the practice of massage
therapy in that state, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are not
inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
B. Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to
limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state to take adverse
Page 8 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
action against a licensee’s single-state license to practice massage therapy in that
state.
C. Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to
limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a remote state to take adverse
action against a licensee’s authorization to practice in that state.
D. Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the commission, shall be construed to
limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee’s home state to take
adverse action against a licensee’s multistate license based upon information
provided by a remote state.
E. Insofar as practical, a member state’s licensing authority shall cooperate with the
commission and with each entity exercising independent regulatory authority
over the practice of massage therapy according to the provisions of this compact.
ARTICLE 6- ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A licensee’s home state shall have exclusive power to impose an adverse action
against a licensee’s multistate license issued by the home state.
B. A home state may take adverse action on a multistate license based on the
investigative information, current significant investigative information, or
adverse action of a remote state.
C. A home state shall retain authority to complete any pending investigations of a
licensee practicing under a multistate license who changes their home state
during the course of such an investigation. The licensing authority shall also be
empowered to report the results of such an investigation to the commission
through the data system as described herein.
D. Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the scope of
practice laws in any other member state for a massage therapist who holds a
multistate license.
E. A remote state shall have the authority to:
Page 9 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
1. Take adverse actions against a licensee’s authorization to practice;
2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a licensee’s
authorization to practice in that state;
3. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of
evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for
the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence
from another member state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court
of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that
court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings before it. The issuing
licensing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and
other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses
or evidence are located;
4. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected licensee the
costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse
action taken against that licensee; and
5. Take adverse action against the licensee’s authorization to practice in that
state based on the factual findings of another member state.
F. If an adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s multistate
license or single-state license to practice in the home state, the licensee’s
authorization to practice in all other member states shall be deactivated until all
encumbrances have been removed from such license. All home state disciplinary
orders that impose an adverse action against a licensee shall include a statement
that the massage therapist’s authorization to practice is deactivated in all member
states during the pendency of the order.
G. If adverse action is taken by a remote state against a licensee’s authorization to
practice, that adverse action applies to all authorizations to practice in all remote
Page 10 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
states. A licensee whose authorization to practice in a remote state is removed for
a specified period of time is not eligible to apply for a new multistate license in
any other state until the specific time for removal of the authorization to practice
has passed and all encumbrance requirements are satisfied.
H. Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s authority to accept a
licensee’s participation in an alternative program in lieu of adverse action. A
licensee’s multistate license shall be suspended for the duration of the licensee’s
participation in any alternative program.
I. Joint Investigations
1. In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its respective scope
of practice laws or other applicable state law, a member state may
participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
2. Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated
under the compact.
ARTICLE 7- ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBERS AND THEIR SPOUSES
Active military members, or their spouses, shall designate a home state where the
individual has a current license to practice massage therapy in good standing. The
individual may retain their home state designation during any period of service when
that individual or their spouse is on active duty assignment.
ARTICLE 8- ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF INTERSTATE MASSAGE
COMPACT COMMISSION
A. The compact member states hereby create and establish a joint government
agency whose membership consists of all member states that have enacted the
compact known as the Interstate Massage Compact Commission. The
commission is an instrumentality of the compact states acting jointly and not an
instrumentality of any one (1) state. The commission shall come into existence on
Page 11 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
or after the effective date of the compact as set forth in Article 12 of this compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate selected by
that member state’s state licensing authority.
2. The delegate shall be the primary administrative officer of the state
licensing authority or their designee.
3. The commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
4. The commission may recommend removal or suspension of any delegate
from office.
5. A member state’s state licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of its
delegate occurring on the commission within sixty (60) days of the vacancy.
6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one (1) vote on all matters that are voted
on by the commission.
7. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The commission
may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar
electronic means.
C. The commission shall have the following powers:
1. Establish the fiscal year of the commission;
2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
3. Adopt rules and bylaws;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this
compact, the commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to
Page 12 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
7. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a member state as
the authenticated business records of the commission, and designate an
agent to do so on the commission's behalf;
8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including but not
limited to employees of a member state;
10. Conduct an annual financial review;
11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties,
grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the
compact, and establish the commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other
related personnel matters;
12. Assess and collect fees;
13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money, other
sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of
interest;
14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property, real,
personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise
dispose of any property, real, personal, or mixed;
16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
17. Borrow money;
18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of members,
state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer
Page 13 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
representatives, and such other interested persons as may be designated in
this compact and the bylaws;
19. Accept and transmit complaints from the public, regulatory or law
enforcement agencies, or the commission, to the relevant member state or
states regarding potential misconduct of licensees;
20. Elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other officers of the
commission as provided in the commission’s bylaws;
21. Establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a vice
chair;
22. Adopt and provide to the member states an annual report;
23. Determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different from
the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the compact; and
24. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve
the purposes of this compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
a. Overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
compact, including compliance with the provisions of the compact, the
commission’s rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed
necessary;
b. Recommending to the commission changes to the rules or bylaws,
changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to compact member
states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
c. Ensuring compact administration services are appropriately provided,
Page 14 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
including by contract;
d. Preparing and recommending the budget;
e. Maintaining financial records on behalf of the commission;
f. Monitoring compact compliance of member states and providing
compliance reports to the commission;
g. Establishing additional committees as necessary;
h. Exercise the powers and duties of the commission during the interim
between commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and
duties expressly reserved to the commission by rule or bylaw; and
i. Other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the commission.
2. The executive committee shall be composed of seven (7) voting members
and up to two (2) ex-officio members as follows:
a. The chair and vice chair of the commission and any other members of
the commission who serve on the executive committee shall be voting
members of the executive committee;
b. Other than the chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer, the
commission shall elect three (3) voting members from the current
membership of the commission; and
c. The commission may elect ex-officio, nonvoting members as necessary
as follows:
i. One (1) ex-officio member who is a representative of the
national association of state massage therapy regulatory boards;
and
ii. One (1) ex-officio member as specified in the commission’s
bylaws.
3. The commission may remove any member of the executive committee as
Page 15 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
provided in the commission’s bylaws.
4. The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
a. Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except that
the executive committee may meet in a closed, nonpublic session of a
public meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered under
subsection F.4. of this article.
b. The executive committee shall give five (5) business days advance
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as determined
to provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the
executive committee intends to address at those meetings.
5. The executive committee may hold an emergency meeting when acting for
the commission to:
a. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
b. Prevent a loss of commission or participating state funds; or
c. Protect public health and safety.
E. The commission shall adopt and provide to the member states an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Commission
1. All meetings of the commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be
posted on the commission’s website at least thirty (30) days prior to the
public meeting.
2. Notwithstanding subsection F.1. of this article, the commission may
convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least twenty-four (24)
hours' prior notice on the commission’s website, and any other means as
provided in the commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense
with notice of proposed rulemaking under Article 10.L. of this compact. The
commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one (1) of the reasons
Page 16 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
justifying an emergency public meeting has been met.
3. Notice of all commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and location
of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via
telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the notice
shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
4. The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting for the
commission to discuss:
a. Noncompliance of a member state with its obligations under the
compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices
or procedures related to specific employees, or other matters related to
the commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the commission or by
a member state’s licensing authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged
or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a
clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged
with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance
issues pursuant to the compact;
Page 17 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
k. Legal advice;
l. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by federal
or member state law; or
m. Other matters as promulgated by the commission by rule.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer shall
state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant exempting
provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
6. The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all
matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description
of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an
action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a
closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority
vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Commission
1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable
expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
2. The commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of revenue,
donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
3. The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each
member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it
grants a multistate license to cover the cost of the operations and activities
of the commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient
to cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the commission
Page 18 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
shall promulgate by rule.
4. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing
the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the
credit of any member states, except by and with the authority of the member
state.
5. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under
its bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the
commission shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or
licensed public accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be
included in and become part of the annual report of the commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and representatives of
the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, both personally and
in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or
personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual
or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred,
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any
such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability
caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
The procurement of insurance of any type by the commission shall not in
any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director,
employee, and representative of the commission in any civil action seeking
Page 19 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission
that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from
retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that
the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's
intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the commission for the
amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of any
licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise abrogate
a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative defense
with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or any
other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign
immunity by the member states or by the commission.
Page 20 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
ARTICLE 9- DATA SYSTEM
A. The commission shall provide for the development, maintenance, operation, and
utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system.
B. The commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate license a unique
identifier, as determined by the rules of the commission.
C. Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a member state
shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all individuals to whom this
compact is applicable as required by the rules of the commission, including:
1. Identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
4. Nonconfidential information related to alternative program participation,
the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other information
related to such participation;
5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the reason or reasons for such
denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information
where prohibited by law;
6. The existence of investigative information;
7. The existence of current significant investigative information; and
8. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact or
the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the commission.
D. The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to this compact
or through the data system, when certified by the commission or an agent thereof,
shall constitute the authenticated business records of the commission, and shall
be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-
judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member state.
E. The existence of current significant investigative information and the existence of
Page 21 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member state shall only
be available to other member states.
F. It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action against a
licensee who holds a multistate license and to monitor the database to determine
whether adverse action has been taken against such a licensee or license
applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or license
applicant in any member state shall be available to any other member state.
G. Member states contributing information to the data system may designate
information that may not be shared with the public without the express
permission of the contributing state.
H. Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently expunged
pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing the
information shall be removed from the data system.
ARTICLE 10- RULEMAKING
A. The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to effectively and
efficiently implement and administer the purposes and provisions of the compact.
A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of competent
jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because the commission exercised its
rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the
compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable
standard of review.
B. The rules of the commission shall have the force of law in each member state,
provided however that where the rules of the commission conflict with the laws of
the member state that establish the member state’s scope of practice as held by a
court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the commission shall be ineffective in
that state to the extent of the conflict.
C. The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set
Page 22 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
forth in this article and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding
as of the date specified by the commission for each rule.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the member states reject a rule or portion of a
rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the
compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule
shall have no further force and effect in any member state or to any state
applying to participate in the compact.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall hold a public hearing
and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts, opinions,
and arguments.
G. Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the commission, and at least thirty (30)
days in advance of the meeting at which the commission will hold a public
hearing on the proposed rule, the commission shall provide a notice of proposed
rulemaking:
1. On the website of the commission or other publicly accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the commission’s notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other way or ways as the commission may by rule specify.
H. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the commission
will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different, the time,
date, and location of the meeting where the commission will consider and
vote on the proposed rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or other
electronic means, the commission shall include the mechanism for access to
the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
Page 23 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
3. The text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person;
and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written comments.
I. All hearings shall be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written comments
and documents received by the commission in response to the proposed rule shall
be available to the public.
J. Nothing in this article shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each
rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings
required by this article.
K. The commission shall, by majority vote of all commissioners, take final action on
the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record.
1. The commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule provided the
changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
2. The commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for substantive
changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for substantive
changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
3. The commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the rule.
Except for an emergency as provided in subsection L. of this article, the
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than thirty (30) days after the
commission issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and
adopt an emergency rule with twenty-four (24) hours' notice, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this article shall be
retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later
than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this
provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately to:
Page 24 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of commission or member state funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by federal
law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
M. The commission or an authorized committee of the commission may direct
revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting typographical
errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public
notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission. The
revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30)
days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the
revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge shall be made in
writing and delivered to the commission prior to the end of the notice period. If
no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action. If the
revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the
commission.
N. No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this compact.
ARTICLE 11- OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight
1. The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member
state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the compact.
2. Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall
be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where
the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may
waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to
participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein
Page 25 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against
a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such similar
matter.
3. The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any
proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.
Failure to provide the commission service of process shall render a
judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated
rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination
1. If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the
performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
promulgated rules, the commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the
proposed means of curing the default, and any other action that the
commission may take, and shall offer training and specific technical
assistance regarding the default.
2. The commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the other
member states.
C. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred
on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of
termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other
means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend
Page 26 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and
minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the defaulting state’s state
licensing authority, and each of the member states’ state licensing authority.
E. A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations,
and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including
obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that state shall
immediately provide notice to all licensees who hold a multistate license within
that state of such termination. The terminated state shall continue to recognize all
licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty
(180) days after the date of said notice of termination.
G. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in
default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in
writing between the commission and the defaulting state.
H. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district
where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
I. Dispute Resolution
1. Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve
disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between
member and non-member states.
2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and
binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement
1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce
the provisions of this compact and the commission’s rules.
Page 27 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
2. By majority vote as provided by commission rule, the commission may
initiate legal action against a member state in default in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the
commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial
enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of
such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein
shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may
pursue any other remedies available under federal or the defaulting
member state’s law.
3. A member state may initiate legal action against the commission in the
United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal
district where the commission has its principal offices to enforce
compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules.
The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the
event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be
awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees.
4. No individual or entity other than a member state may enforce this compact
against the commission.
ARTICLE 12- EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is
enacted into law in the seventh member state.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene
and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to determine
if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially
different than the model compact statute.
Page 28 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
a. A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Article 11 of this compact.
b. If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or
withdraws from the compact, the commission shall remain in
existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
member states should be less than seven (7).
2. Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member
states shall be subject to the process set forth in Article 8.C.23. of this
compact to determine if their enactments are materially different from the
model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the
compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the commission or in furtherance of the
purposes of the administration of the compact prior to the effective date of
the compact or the commission coming into existence shall be considered to
be actions of the commission unless specifically repudiated by the
commission.
4. Any state that joins the compact shall be subject to the commission’s rules
and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in
that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission
shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes
law in that state.
B. Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute
repealing that state’s enactment of the compact.
1. A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until one hundred eighty
(180) days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing
Page 29 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse
action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a state
shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees within
that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses
granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty
(180) days after the date of such notice of withdrawal.
C. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any
licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a member state
and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions of this compact.
D. This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this
compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is
enacted into the laws of all member states.
ARTICLE 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the commission’s rulemaking authority shall be liberally
construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation and
administration of the compact. Provisions of the compact expressly authorizing or
requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to limit the
commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent jurisdiction
to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state seeking
participation in the compact, or of the United States, or the applicability thereof
to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional
by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact
Page 30 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
and the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding subsection B. of this article, the commission may deny a state’s
participation in the compact or, in accordance with the requirements of Article
11.B. of this compact terminate a member state’s participation in the compact, if
it determines that a constitutional requirement of a member state is a material
departure from the compact. Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be
contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as
to the member state affected as to all severable matters.
ARTICLE 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member
state that is not inconsistent with the compact. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other
legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the
extent of the conflict. All permissible agreements between the commission and the
member states are binding in accordance with their terms.
ARTICLE 15. APPLICABILITY TO KENTUCKY STATE GOVERNMENT
In order to clarify the effect of certain provisions of this compact and to ensure that the
rights and responsibilities of the various branches of government are maintained, the
following shall be in effect in this state:
A. By entering into this compact, this state authorizes the state licensing authority as
defined in Article 2 of this compact and as created by KRS 309.354 to implement
the provisions of this compact.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of this compact to the contrary:
1. When a rule is adopted pursuant to Article 10 of this compact, the state
licensing authority as defined by Article 2 of this compact shall have sixty
Page 31 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 487
(60) days to review the rule for the purpose of filing the rule as an
emergency administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.190 and for
filing the rule as an accompanying ordinary administrative regulation,
following the requirements of KRS Chapter 13A. Failure by the state
licensing authority as defined by Article 2 of this compact to promulgate a
rule adopted by the commission as an administrative regulation pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A shall result in the initiation of the process for withdrawal
as set forth in Article 12 of this compact. Nothing in these provisions shall
negate the applicability and effect of Article 10 of this compact to this state.
2. If the proposed administrative regulation is found deficient and the
deficiency is not resolved pursuant to KRS 13A.330 or 13A.335, the
provisions of Article 11 of this compact shall apply. If the procedures under
Article 11 of this compact fail to resolve an issue, the provisions of Article
12 of this compact shall apply.
3. If the commission created by Article 8 of this compact exercises its
rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes
of this compact, or the powers granted under this compact, then such an
action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force or effect.
C. Article 8 of this compact pertaining to the financing of the commission shall not
be interpreted to obligate the general fund of this state. Any funds used to finance
this compact shall be from money collected pursuant to KRS 309.350 to 309.364.
D. This compact shall apply only to those massage therapists who practice or work
under a compact privilege.
Page 32 of 32
XXXX 1/6/2026 3:07 PM Jacketed